California statutes. Insurance Code
(a) With respect to large group health insurance, an insurer and its officials, employees, agents, and representatives shall not, directly or indirectly, employ marketing practices or benefit designs that will have the effect of discouraging the enrollment of individuals with significant health needs or discriminating based on an individual’s race, color, national origin, present or predicted disability, age, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, expected length of life, degree of medical dependency, quality of life, or other health conditions.

(b) An insurer that violates this section shall be liable for an administrative penalty of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the first violation, and not more than five
 thousand dollars ($5,000) for each subsequent violation.

(c) An insurer that violates this section with a frequency that indicates a general business practice or commits a knowing violation of this section shall be liable for an administrative penalty of not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), and not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each violation.

(d) This section does not apply to a grandfathered large group health insurance policy or a specialized health insurance policy that covers only dental or vision benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 636, Sec. 2.   (SB 280)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.29.

(a) (1) For a small employer health insurance policy offered, sold, or renewed on or after January 1, 2014, the deductible under the policy shall not exceed:

(A) Two thousand dollars ($2,000) in the case of a policy covering a single individual.

(B) Four thousand dollars ($4,000) in the case of any other policy.

(2) The dollar amounts in this section shall be indexed consistent with Section 1302(c)(4) of PPACA and any federal rules or guidance pursuant to that section.

(3) The limitation in this subdivision
 shall be applied in a manner that does not affect the actuarial value of any small employer health insurance policy.

(4) For small group products at the bronze level of coverage, as defined in Section 10112.295, the department may permit insurers to offer a higher deductible in order to meet the actuarial value requirement of the bronze level. In making this determination, the department shall consider affordability of cost sharing for insureds and shall also consider whether insureds may be deterred from seeking appropriate care because of higher cost sharing.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow a policy to have a deductible that applies to preventive services as defined in PPACA.

(c) This section shall not apply to multiple employer welfare arrangements regulated pursuant to Article 4.7
 (commencing with Section 742.20) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 that provide health care benefits to their members and that comply with small group health reforms unless otherwise required by federal law or guidance.

(d) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 641, Sec. 4.   (AB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.291.

(a) For a health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2022, in the individual or group market, a health insurer shall monitor an insured’s accrual toward their annual deductible, if any, for covered
 benefits, as set forth in this section and any regulations promulgated by the department.

(1) A health insurer shall provide an insured with their accrual balance toward their annual deductible for every month in which benefits were used and until the accrual balance equals the full deductible amount.

(2) A health insurer subject to this section shall establish and maintain a system that allows an insured to request
 their most up-to-date accrual balance toward their annual deductible from their health insurer at any time.

(3) If the health insurance policy includes more than one annual deductible for an insured, then this section applies to each deductible.

(b) For a health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2022, in the individual or group market, an insurer shall monitor an insured’s accrual balance toward their annual out-of-pocket maximum, if any, for covered
 benefits, as set forth in this section and any regulations promulgated by the department.

(1) A health insurer shall provide an insured with their accrual balance toward their annual out-of-pocket maximum for every month in which benefits were
 used and until the accrual balance equals the full out-of-pocket maximum.

(2) A health insurer subject to this section shall establish and maintain a system that allows an insured to request their most up-to-date accrual balance toward their annual out-of-pocket maximum from their health insurer at any time.

(c) Accrual updates shall be mailed to an insured unless the insured has elected to opt out of mailed notice and elected to receive the accrual update electronically as allowed according to Section
 38.6, or unless the insured has previously opted out of mailed notices.

(1) Insureds who have opted out of receiving mailed notice may opt back in at any time.

(2) Accrual updates may be included with evidence of benefit statements.

(d) A health insurer shall notify insureds of their rights pursuant to this section, including, but not limited to, how to request information and how to opt out of mailed notices and elect to instead receive their accrual update electronically, in the manner set forth by the department. The department may issue guidance regarding implementation of, and compliance with, this subdivision. This guidance shall not be subject to the
 Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 1340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), until January 1, 2027. The department shall consult with stakeholders in developing guidance pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) If a health insurer delegates claims payment functions to a contracted entity, including, but not limited to, a medical group or independent practice association, the delegated entity shall comply with the requirements of this section. A health insurer shall specify by contract the delegated entity’s responsibilities and shall monitor the delegated entity to ensure compliance with this section. Notwithstanding delegation pursuant to this subdivision, the health insurer shall remain responsible for compliance with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 602, Sec. 2.   (SB 368)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.295.

(a) Levels of coverage for the nongrandfathered individual market are defined as follows:

(1) Bronze level: A health insurance policy in the bronze level shall provide a level of coverage that is actuarially equivalent to 60 percent of the full actuarial value of the benefits provided under the policy.

(2) Silver level: A health insurance policy in the silver level shall provide a level of coverage that is actuarially equivalent to 70 percent of the full actuarial value of the benefits provided under the policy.

(3) Gold level: A health
 insurance policy in the gold level shall provide a level of coverage that is actuarially equivalent to 80 percent of the full actuarial value of the benefits provided under the policy.

(4) Platinum level: A health insurance policy in the platinum level shall provide a level of coverage that is actuarially equivalent to 90 percent of the full actuarial value of the benefits provided under the policy.

(b) Actuarial value for nongrandfathered individual health insurance policies shall be determined in accordance with the following:

(1) Actuarial value shall not vary by more than plus or minus 2 percent.

(2) Actuarial value shall be determined on the
 basis of essential health benefits as defined in Section 10112.27 and as provided to a standard, nonelderly population. For this purpose, a standard population shall not include those receiving coverage through the Medi-Cal or Medicare programs.

(3) The department may use the actuarial value methodology developed consistent with Section 1302(d) of PPACA.

(4) The actuarial value for pediatric dental benefits, whether offered by a major medical policy or a specialized health insurance policy, shall be consistent with federal law and guidance applicable to the policy type.

(5) The department, in consultation with the Department of Managed Health Care and the Exchange, shall consider whether to exercise
 state-level flexibility with respect to the actuarial value calculator in order to take into account the unique characteristics of the California health care coverage market, including the prevalence of health insurance policies, total cost of care paid for by the health insurer, price of care, patterns of service utilization, and relevant demographic factors.

(c) (1) A catastrophic policy is a health insurance policy that provides no benefits for any plan year until the insured has incurred cost-sharing expenses in an amount equal to the annual limit on out-of-pocket costs as specified in Section 10112.28 except that it shall provide coverage for at least three primary care visits. A carrier that is not participating in the Exchange shall not offer, market, or sell a catastrophic plan in the individual market.

(2) A catastrophic policy may be offered only in the individual market and only if consistent with this paragraph. Catastrophic policies may be offered only if either of the following apply:

(A) The individual purchasing the policy has not yet attained 30 years of age before the beginning of the plan year.

(B) The individual has a certificate of exemption from Section 5000(A) of the Internal Revenue Code because the individual is not offered affordable coverage or because the individual faces hardship.

(d) This section shall apply to a policy of health insurance, as defined in subdivision (b) of
 Section 106, that covers any essential health benefit as defined in Section 10112.27. This section shall not apply to a specialized health insurance policy that does not cover any of the essential health benefits.

(e) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 316, Sec. 12.   (SB 639)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.296.

Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 10112.295 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 10112.297, the actuarial value for a nongrandfathered bronze level health insurance policy that either covers and pays for at least one major service, other than preventive services, before the deductible or meets the requirements to be a high deductible health plan, as defined in Section 223(c)(2) of Title 26 of the United States Code, may range from plus 5 percent to minus 2 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 12, Sec. 36.   (AB 80)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.297.

(a) Levels of coverage for the nongrandfathered small group market are defined as follows:

(1) Bronze level: A health insurance policy in the bronze level shall provide a level of coverage that is actuarially equivalent to 60 percent of the full actuarial value of the benefits provided under the policy.

(2) Silver level: A health insurance policy in the silver level shall provide a level of coverage that is actuarially equivalent to 70 percent of the full actuarial value of the benefits provided under the policy.

(3) Gold level: A health
 insurance policy in the gold level shall provide a level of coverage that is actuarially equivalent to 80 percent of the full actuarial value of the benefits provided under the policy.

(4) Platinum level: A health insurance policy in the platinum level shall provide a level of coverage that is actuarially equivalent to 90 percent of the full actuarial value of the benefits provided under the policy.

(b) Actuarial value for nongrandfathered small employer health insurance policies shall be determined in accordance with the following:

(1) Actuarial value shall not vary by more than plus or minus 2 percent.

(2) Actuarial value shall be determined on the
 basis of essential health benefits as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10112.27 and as provided to a standard, nonelderly population. For this purpose, a standard population shall not include those receiving coverage through the Medi-Cal or Medicare programs.

(3) The department may use the actuarial value methodology developed consistent with Section 1302(d) of PPACA.

(4) The actuarial value for pediatric dental benefits, whether offered by a major medical policy or a specialized health insurance policy, shall be consistent with federal law and guidance applicable to the policy type.

(5) The department, in consultation with the Department of Managed Health Care and the Exchange, shall
 consider whether to exercise state-level flexibility with respect to the actuarial value calculator in order to take into account the unique characteristics of the California health care coverage market, including the prevalence of health insurance policies, total cost of care paid for by the health insurer, price of care, patterns of service utilization, and relevant demographic factors.

(6) Employer contributions toward health reimbursement accounts and health savings accounts shall count toward the actuarial value of the product in the manner specified in federal rules and guidance.

(c) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law
 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 316, Sec. 13.   (SB 639)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Exchange” means the California Health Benefit Exchange established in Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code.

(2) “Federal act” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any amendments to, or regulations or guidance issued under, those acts.

(3) “Qualified health plan” has the same meaning as that term is
 defined in Section 1301 of the federal act.

(4) “Small employer” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 10753.

(b) (1) Health insurers participating in the individual market of the Exchange shall fairly and affirmatively offer, market, and sell in the individual market of the Exchange at least one product within each of the five levels of coverage contained in subsections (d) and (e) of Section 1302 of the federal act. Health insurers participating in the Small Business Health Options Program (SHOP Program) of the Exchange, established pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 100504 of the Government Code, shall fairly and affirmatively offer, market, and sell in the SHOP Program at least one product within each of the four levels of coverage contained in
 subsection (d) of Section 1302 of the federal act.

(2) The board established under Section 100500 of the Government Code may require insurers to sell additional products within each of the levels of coverage identified in paragraph (1).

(3) This subdivision shall not apply to an insurer that solely offers supplemental coverage in the Exchange under paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 100504 of the Government Code. This subdivision shall not apply to a bridge plan product of a Medi-Cal managed care plan that contracts with the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Section 14005.70 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and that meets the requirements of Section 100504.5 of the Government Code, to the extent approved by the appropriate federal agency.

(c) (1) Health insurers participating in the Exchange that sell any products outside the Exchange shall do both of the following:

(A) Fairly and affirmatively offer, market, and sell all products made available to individuals in the Exchange to individuals purchasing coverage outside the Exchange.

(B) Fairly and affirmatively offer, market, and sell all products made available to small employers in the Exchange to small employers purchasing coverage outside the Exchange.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “product” does not include contracts entered into pursuant to Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693) of Division 2 between the
 Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board and health insurers for enrolled Healthy Families beneficiaries or to contracts entered into pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of, or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of, Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code between the State Department of Health Care Services and health insurers for enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries or for contracts with bridge plan products that meet the requirements of Section 100504.5 of the Government Code.

(d) (1) Commencing January 1, 2014, a health insurer shall, with respect to individual policies that cover hospital, medical, or surgical benefits, only sell the five levels of coverage contained in subsections (d) and (e) of Section 1302 of the federal act, except that a health insurer that does not participate in the
 Exchange shall, with respect to individual policies that cover hospital, medical, or surgical benefits, only sell the four levels of coverage contained in subsection (d) of Section 1302 of the federal act.

(2) Commencing January 1, 2014, a health insurer shall, with respect to small employer policies that cover hospital, medical, or surgical expenses, only sell the four levels of coverage contained in subsection (d) of Section 1302 of the federal act.

(e) Commencing January 1, 2014, a health insurer that does not participate in the Exchange shall, with respect to individual or small employer policies that cover hospital, medical, or surgical expenses, offer at least one standardized product that has been designated by the Exchange in each of the four levels of coverage contained
 in subsection (d) of Section 1302 of the federal act. This subdivision shall only apply if the board of the Exchange exercises its authority under subdivision (c) of Section 100504 of the Government Code. Nothing in this subdivision shall require an insurer that does not participate in the Exchange to offer standardized products in the small employer market if the insurer only sells products in the individual market. Nothing in this subdivision shall require an insurer that does not participate in the
 Exchange to offer standardized products in the individual market if the insurer only sells products in the small employer market. This subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit the insurer from offering other products provided that it complies with subdivision (d).

(f) For purposes of this section, a bridge plan product shall mean an individual health benefit plan, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 10198.6 that is offered by a health insurer that contracts with the Exchange pursuant to Section 100504.5 of the Government Code.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on the October 1 that is five years after the date that federal approval of the bridge plan option occurs, and, as of the second January 1 thereafter, is repealed, unless a later enacted
 statute that is enacted before that date deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 11) by Stats. 2014, Ch. 572, Sec. 16.   (SB 959)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Conditionally inoperative, on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed, by its own provisions, on second January 1 after inoperative date.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 17 of Stats. 2014, Ch. 572.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Exchange” means the California Health Benefit Exchange established in Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code.

(2) “Federal act” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any amendments to, or regulations or guidance issued under, those acts.

(3) “Qualified health plan” has the same meaning as that term is
 defined in Section 1301 of the federal act.

(4) “Small employer” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 10753.

(b) (1) Health insurers participating in the individual market of the Exchange shall fairly and affirmatively offer, market, and sell in the individual market of the Exchange at least one product within each of the five levels of coverage contained in subsections (d) and (e) of Section 1302 of the federal act. Health insurers participating in the Small Business Health Options Program (SHOP Program) of the Exchange, established pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 100504 of the Government Code, shall fairly and affirmatively offer, market, and sell in the SHOP Program at least one product within each of the four levels of coverage
 contained in subsection (d) of Section 1302 of the federal act.

(2) The board established under Section 100500 of the Government Code may require insurers to sell additional products within each of the levels of coverage identified in paragraph (1).

(3) This subdivision shall not apply to an insurer that solely offers supplemental coverage in the Exchange under paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 100504 of the Government Code.

(c) (1) Health insurers participating in the Exchange that sell any products outside the Exchange shall do both of the following:

(A) Fairly and affirmatively offer, market, and sell all products made available to
 individuals in the Exchange to individuals purchasing coverage outside the Exchange.

(B) Fairly and affirmatively offer, market, and sell all products made available to small employers in the Exchange to small employers purchasing coverage outside the Exchange.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “product” does not include contracts entered into pursuant to Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693) of Division 2 between the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board and health insurers for enrolled Healthy Families beneficiaries or to contracts entered into pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of, or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of, Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code between the State Department of Health Care Services and health
 insurers for enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(d) (1) Commencing January 1, 2014, a health insurer shall, with respect to individual policies that cover hospital, medical, or surgical benefits, only sell the five levels of coverage contained in subsections (d) and (e) of Section 1302 of the federal act, except that a health insurer that does not participate in the Exchange shall, with respect to individual policies that cover hospital, medical, or surgical benefits, only sell the four levels of coverage contained in subsection (d) of Section 1302 of the federal act.

(2) Commencing January 1, 2014, a health insurer shall, with respect to small employer policies that cover hospital, medical, or surgical expenses, only sell the four levels of coverage contained in
 subsection (d) of Section 1302 of the federal act.

(e) Commencing January 1, 2014, a health insurer that does not participate in the Exchange shall, with respect to individual or small employer policies that cover hospital, medical, or surgical expenses, offer at least one standardized product that has been designated by the Exchange in each of the four levels of coverage contained in subsection (d) of Section 1302 of the federal act. This subdivision shall only apply if the board of the Exchange exercises its authority under subdivision (c) of Section 100504 of the Government Code. Nothing in this subdivision shall require an insurer that does not participate in the Exchange to offer standardized products in the small employer market if the insurer only sells products in the individual market. Nothing in this subdivision shall require an
 insurer that does not participate in the Exchange to offer standardized products in the individual market if the insurer only sells products in the small employer market. This subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit the insurer from offering other products provided that it complies with subdivision (d).

(f) This section shall become operative only if Section 11 of the act that added this section becomes inoperative pursuant to subdivision (g) of that Section 11.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 12) by Stats. 2014, Ch. 572, Sec. 17.   (SB 959)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.300.

(a) (1) A small employer health benefit plan in effect on December 31, 2013, and still in effect as of the effective date of this section, that does not qualify as a grandfathered health plan under Section 1251 of PPACA may be renewed until January 1, 2015, and may continue to be in force until December 31, 2015, subject to applicable federal law, and any other requirements imposed by this part.

(2) A small employer health benefit plan described in paragraph (1) may continue to be in force after December 31, 2015, if the
 plan is amended to comply with all of the provisions listed in subdivision (e) by January 1, 2016, and complies with all other applicable provisions of law.

(b) (1) If an insurer offers for renewal a small employer health benefit plan pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the insurer shall provide notice to the group contractholder regarding the option to renew coverage pursuant to subdivision (a) using the relevant notice attached to the guidance entitled “Insurance Standards Bulletin Series – Extension of Transition Policy through October 1, 2016,” issued by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for
 Medicare and Medicaid Services on March 5, 2014.

(2) An insurer shall include the following notice with the notice issued pursuant to paragraph (1):
“New health care coverage options are available in California. You currently have health care coverage that is not required to comply with many new laws. A new health benefit plan may be more affordable and/or offer more comprehensive benefits. New plans may also have limits on deductibles and out-of-pocket costs, while your existing
 plan may have no such limits.

You have the option to remain with your current coverage for one more year or switch to new coverage that complies with the new laws. Covered California, the state’s new health insurance marketplace, offers small employers health insurance from a number of companies through its Small Business Health Options Program (SHOP). Federal tax credits are available through the SHOP to those small employers that qualify. Talk to Covered California (1-877-453-9198), your plan representative,
 or your insurance agent to discuss
 your
 options.”
(3) An insurer shall include with the notices issued pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), the premium, cost sharing, and benefits associated with the plan’s standard benefit designs approved consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 100504 of the Government Code for the geographic region of the small employer.

(4) An insurer that offers for renewal a small employer health benefit plan pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall offer renewal to all employers whose health benefit plan with that insurer was in effect on December 31, 2013.

(c) (1) A small employer health benefit plan in effect on December 31, 2013, and still in effect as of the effective date of this section, that does not qualify as a grandfathered health plan under Section 1251 of PPACA that is renewed on or before January 1, 2015, and that continues to be in force until no later than December 31, 2015, is exempt from the following provisions:

(A) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of, and subdivisions (c), (g),
 and (k) of, Section 10753.05.

(B) Section 10753.14.

(C) Section 10112.27.

(D) Section 10112.285.

(E) Section 10112.28.

(F) Section 10112.29.

(G) Section 10112.297.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of, and subdivision (g) of, Section 10753.05, a small employer health benefit plan subject to this section shall only be offered, marketed, and sold to an employer whose health benefit plan with that insurer was in effect on December 31, 2013.

(d) A small employer health benefit plan described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be subject to Sections 10714 and 10715, and shall continue to be subject to Chapter 8.01 (commencing with Section 10753), except as provided in subdivision (c), and to all otherwise
 applicable provisions of this part.

(e) No later than January 1, 2016, a small employer health benefit plan described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) may be amended to comply with all of the following:

(1) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of, and subdivisions (c), (g), and (k) of, Section 10753.05.

(2) Section 10753.14.

(3) Section 10112.27.

(4) Section 10112.28.

(5) Section 10112.29.

(6) Section 10112.297.

(f) This
 section shall be implemented only to the extent permitted by PPACA.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Health benefit plan” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 10753.

(2) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to that law.

(3) “Small employer health benefit plan” means a group health benefit plan issued to a small employer, as defined in Section 10753.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 84, Sec. 2.   (SB 1446)   Effective July 7, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.35.

(a) An insurer providing individual coverage in the Exchange shall cooperate with requests from the Exchange to collaborate in the development of, and participate in the implementation of, the Medi-Cal program’s premium and cost-sharing payments under Sections 14102 and 14148.65 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for eligible Exchange insureds.

(b) An insurer providing individual coverage in the Exchange shall not charge, bill, ask, or require an insured receiving benefits under Section 14102 or 14148.65 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to make any premium or cost-sharing payments for any services that are subject to premium or cost-sharing payments by the State Department of Health Care Services under Section
 14102 or 14148.65 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) For purposes of this section, “Exchange” means the California Health Benefit Exchange established pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 368.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.4.

The commissioner shall, in coordination with the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care, review the Internet portal developed by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services under subdivision (a) of Section 1103 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (P.L. 111-148) and paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 1311 of that act, and any enhancements to that portal expected to be implemented by the secretary on or before January 1, 2015. The review shall examine whether the Internet portal provides sufficient information regarding all health benefit products offered by health care service plans and health insurers in the individual and small employer markets in California to facilitate fair and affirmative marketing of all individual and small employer products,
 particularly outside the California Health Benefit Exchange created under Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code. If the commissioner and the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care jointly determine that the Internet portal does not adequately achieve those purposes, they shall jointly develop and maintain an electronic clearinghouse to achieve those purposes. In performing this function, the commissioner and the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care shall routinely monitor individual and small employer benefit filings with, and complaints submitted by individuals and small employers to, their respective departments, and shall use any other available means to maintain the clearinghouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 186.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every policy or certificate of health insurance marketed, issued, or delivered to a resident of this state, regardless of the situs of the contract or master group policyholder, shall be subject to all provisions of this code.

(2) (A) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to a policy or certificate of health insurance that is issued outside of California to an employer whose principal place of business and majority of employees are located outside of California.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), no policy or certificate of
 health insurance marketed, issued, or delivered to a resident of this state shall discriminate in coverage between spouses or domestic partners of a different sex and spouses or domestic partners of the same sex.

(3) Nothing in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) shall be construed to limit the applicability of any other provision of this code to any policy or certificate of health insurance that is issued outside of California to an employer whose principal place of business and majority of employees are located outside of California.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every policy or certificate of group health insurance marketed, issued, or delivered to a resident of this state, regardless of the situs of the contract or master group policyholder, shall be subject to Section 10121.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 722, Sec. 3.   (SB 757)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.6.

(a) Consistent with federal law, a sponsor of a prescription drug plan authorized by the federal Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003 (P.L. 108-173) shall hold a valid license as a life and disability insurer issued by the department or as a health care service plan issued by the Department of Managed Health Care.

(b) An entity that is licensed as a life and disability insurer and that operates a prescription drug plan shall be subject to the provisions of this code, unless preempted by federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 230, Sec. 2.   Effective September 6, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.7.

(a) A group or individual health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2014, that provides or covers any benefits with respect to services in an emergency department of a hospital shall cover emergency services as follows:

(1) Without the need for any prior authorization determination.

(2) Whether the health care provider furnishing the services is a participating provider with respect to those services.

(3) In a manner so that, if the services are provided to an insured:

(A) By a nonparticipating health care provider with or without prior authorization; or

(B) (i) The services will be provided without imposing any requirement under the policy for prior authorization of services or any limitation on coverage where the provider of services does not have a contractual relationship with the insurer for the providing of services that is more restrictive than the requirements or limitations that apply to emergency department services received from providers who do have such a contractual relationship with the insurer; and

(ii) If the services are provided to an insured out-of-network, the cost-sharing requirement, expressed as a copayment amount or coinsurance rate, is the same requirement that would apply if the
 services were provided in-network.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the term “emergency services” means, with respect to an emergency medical condition:

(1) A medical screening examination that is within the capability of the emergency department of a hospital, including ancillary services routinely available to the emergency department to evaluate that emergency medical condition.

(2) Within the capabilities of the staff and facilities available at the hospital, further medical examination and treatment as are required under Section 1867(e)(3) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395dd(e)(3)) to stabilize the patient.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 316, Sec. 14.   (SB 639)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.75.

(a) If a health insurer sends payment for services provided directly to the insured and not to the provider, the insurer shall send notice to the insured and the provider who provided the services that the insurer has sent payment to the insured.

(b) The notice sent to the insured pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include all of the following:

(1) The date the notice was sent and the name and address of the provider who billed for the service.

(2) A statement that if the insured has paid the full bill for the service, including both their cost-sharing and the insurer share of cost obligation, the actions
 described to collect the insurer obligated payment in paragraph (3) do not apply, and that this check is for reimbursement of the consumer for paying the insurer share of cost obligation.

(3) Information about action that may be taken if the insured does not send the insurer’s obligated payment to the provider, including all of the following:

(A) That an unpaid bill may be sent to collections and the insured may be subject to collections.

(B) That the provider or debt collector may pursue litigation against the insured to collect the bill.

(C) That the unpaid insurer share of cost obligation may be reported to a credit reporting agency as medical debt if the provider does not receive the payment within 60 days of the notice, or within one year after
 initial billing for the service, whichever is later.

(c) The required notice sent to the provider pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include the date that the notice to the insured was sent and the amount sent to the insured to reimburse the provider.
